Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
24-7-901. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alternate retirement plan” means a retirement plan based on the purchase of contracts providing retirement and death benefits for the instructors and administrative staff of the technical institutes or postsecondary vocational-technical schools of the State of Arkansas and the staff of the Department of Career Education and which has been approved by the Career Education and Workforce Development Board;

“Retirement system” means the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System;

“School” means any technical institute or postsecondary vocational-technical school established pursuant to § 6-51-202 for the vocational training of students; and

“Staff members” means both instructors and administrative staff of a technical institute or postsecondary vocational-technical school and the staff of the department who are eligible for membership in the retirement system.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1466; Acts 1999, No. 1323, § 49; 2019, No. 84, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2009, No 787, § 2, provided: “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities renamed State Board of Career Education.

“(a)(1) The State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, as it is referred to or empowered through the Arkansas Code, is renamed.

“(2) In its place, the State Board of Career Education is established, succeeding to the general powers and responsibilities previously assigned to the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities.

“(3) The Chair of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities shall identify and revise all interagency agreements, financial instruments, funds, and other necessary legal documents in order to effect this change.

“(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed as impairing the power and authority of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities before the effective date of the name change.

“(c) Appropriations authorized for the personal services and operating expenses of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities may be utilized for the personal services and operating expenses of the State Board of Career Education.”

The Department of Career Education was previously known as the Department of Workforce Education. References in this subchapter apply to those members of an alternate retirement plan as previously established under this subchapter. Accordingly, these references were not included in 2019 Acts No. 910 that amended some of these entity names.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed the defined terms of “Board”, “Department”, “Director”, and “State”, and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in present (1), substituted “Department of Career Education” for “Department of Workforce Education” and “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “board”; and substituted “department” for “Department of Workforce Education” in (4).

24-7-902. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the construction of this subchapter, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 979, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 480, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1473.

24-7-903. Provisions of subchapter controlling.

Insofar as the provisions of this subchapter are, or may be, inconsistent with the provisions of any other general or special act, the provisions of this subchapter shall be controlling.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1474.

24-7-904. Establishment and administration of plan.

The Career Education and Workforce Development Board may establish and maintain an alternate retirement plan which shall authorize the purchase of contracts providing retirement and death benefits for staff members.

Under the plan, staff members shall contribute, to the extent authorized or required, toward the purchase of the contract, which shall be issued to and become the property of the participants.

The alternate retirement plan shall be administered by the board pursuant to a written alternate retirement plan document, which shall be formally adopted by the board prior to the establishment of the alternate retirement plan.

The board shall have the authority to administer all alternate retirement plans established pursuant to this subchapter and to perform or authorize the performance of all such functions as may be reasonably appropriate in their administration.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, §§ 2, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-1467, 80-1472; Acts 2019, No. 84, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to the renaming of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” in (a).

24-7-905. Methods of providing benefits — Agent for service of process.

An alternate retirement plan may be a separate system or fund or may be one which participates in a larger system or fund with respect to some or all of the benefits provided thereunder.

The benefits to be provided for or on behalf of staff members under an alternate retirement plan may be provided through insurance policies or annuity contracts, both fixed and variable in nature, or a combination thereof, as specified in the plan. Those insurance policies and annuity contracts may be obtained from any insurance company authorized to do business in this state or from any nonprofit companies organized and operated exclusively for the purpose of aiding and strengthening educational or scientific institutions by issuing insurance or annuity contracts only to or for the benefit of such institutions or individuals engaged in their services.

In any action brought by a staff member on a policy or contract, any school, school official, or any member of the Career Education and Workforce Development Board shall be deemed to be the agent of the nonprofit company or insurance company only for the purpose of service of process on the contract or policy, and for no other purpose.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1468; Acts 2019, No. 84, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to the renaming of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” in (c).

24-7-906. Approval of companies and contracts.

The Career Education and Workforce Development Board shall approve the companies from which contracts are to be purchased under the alternate retirement plan and shall approve the form and contents of the contracts.

In giving the approval, the board shall give due consideration to:

The nature and extent of the rights and benefits to be provided by the contracts for staff members and their beneficiaries;

The relation of those rights and benefits to the amount of contributions to be made pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter;

The suitability of the rights and benefits to the needs of the staff members and the interests of the vocational education school and the Department of Career Education in the recruitment and retention of staff members; and

The ability of the approved companies to provide the suitable rights and benefits under the contracts.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1471; Acts 2019, No. 84, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to the renaming of the Department of Career Education, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities” in (a).

24-7-907. Participation in plan.

Participation in an alternate retirement plan established pursuant to this subchapter shall be as follows:

All staff members shall participate in either the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or an alternate retirement plan or may participate in both, but participation in both shall be limited to the circumstances described in subdivision (2) of this section;

Any staff member who has become fully vested in the retirement system may:

Continue as an active member of the retirement system;

Discontinue contributing to the retirement system, thus becoming an inactive member of the retirement system, and participate instead in an alternate retirement plan. Under those circumstances, the staff member would be both an inactive member of the retirement system and an active member of the alternate retirement plan; or

Participate in an alternate retirement plan and receive all accumulated contributions to the credit of the staff member in the members' deposit account which is maintained pursuant to the provisions of § 24-7-406 and have the member's credited service under the retirement system cancelled;

Any staff member who has participated in the retirement system for a period which is insufficient to allow for full vesting of that staff member's retirement system benefits may:

Continue as an active member of the retirement system;

Discontinue membership in the retirement system and transfer from the retirement system into his or her account with the alternate retirement plan, i.e., roll over all contributions which the staff member has previously made to the retirement system; or

Participate in the alternate retirement plan and receive all accumulated contributions to the credit of the staff member in the members' deposit account which is maintained pursuant to the provisions of § 24-7-406 and have the member's credited service under the retirement system cancelled;

No staff member may participate in an alternate retirement plan without giving prior written notice of his or her election to participate in the alternate retirement plan.

The notice of election shall be in writing on a form established by the Department of Career Education and filed with both the Director of the Division of Higher Education and the retirement system.

New staff members shall make the election within ninety (90) days after the date of their employment;

Effective July 1, 2001, a staff member who elected to participate in an alternate retirement plan may elect to become a member of the retirement system.

Service credit forfeited while a member of an alternate retirement plan cannot be established in the retirement system.

The election to withdraw from the alternate retirement plan and become a member of the retirement system shall be made by December 31, 2001, and notice of the election shall be made in writing to the director and the retirement system by December 31, 2001.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 4; 1985, No. 250, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1469; Acts 1993, No. 979, § 1; 1995, No. 332, § 2; 1997, No. 944, § 2; 1999, No. 908, § 2; 2001, No. 1784, § 2; 2013, No. 140, § 9; 2019, No. 910, § 2378.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to the renaming of
the Department of Career Education, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 250, § 1, provided, in part, that any staff member not then participating in the alternate retirement plan could make the election by September 1, 1985, further provided that any staff member who elected to become an inactive member of the retirement system and participate in the alternate retirement plan could elect to receive all accumulated contributions to the credit of the staff member in the members' deposit account maintained pursuant to § 24-7-406 and to have the member's credited service under the system canceled, and also provided that notice of such election should be made in writing to the director and the retirement system by September 1, 1985.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (5)(A), substituted “a staff member who elected” for
“staff members who elect” and “a member” for “members.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Career Education” in (4)(B).

24-7-908. Contributions.

The Department of Career Education shall contribute to the alternate retirement plan on behalf of each participating staff member an amount equal to the contribution made by the State of Arkansas for persons participating in the retirement system.

Each staff member shall also contribute to the alternate retirement plan an amount equal to the maximum allowable member contribution under the retirement system or, at the option of the staff member, additional amounts allowable under the alternate retirement plan.

Payment of contributions by the department which are authorized by the provisions of this section shall be made by the disbursing officer of the department.

All staff members who elect to participate in the alternate retirement plan shall so notify the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities in writing.

The board shall establish a procedure for notifying the state official charged with paying the salaries of staff members, which official shall cause staff members' contributions to be withheld and forwarded to the company approved by the board and designated by the staff member.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 480, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1470; Acts 2019, No. 84, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to the renaming of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

As to the renaming of the Department of Career Education, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Career Education” for “Department of Workforce Education” in (a)(1).

24-7-909. Extension of group insurance coverage by dependents of deceased eligible employee.

Upon the death of an insured eligible employee of an institution of higher education or of an insured eligible employee who is a member of the alternate retirement plan for employees of the Career Education and Workforce Development Board or of a person retired and receiving benefits under the alternate plan, the dependents of the deceased person shall have the same option to extend the group insurance coverage of the dependents under the state group insurance plan as is afforded dependents of other deceased insured employees and retirants.

History.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 2; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3113.1; Acts 2019, No. 84, § 6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to the renaming of the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, see A.C.R.C. Notes, § 24-7-901.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Career Education and Workforce Development Board” for “State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities”.

Subchapter 10
— Employees of Particular Institutions

Cross References.

Membership in system, § 24-4-301 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1945, No. 83, § 3: Feb. 21, 1945.

Acts 1971, No. 9, § 8: July 1, 1971.

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1075, § 5: Jan. 30, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that some of the employees of the State colleges which were merged into the University of Arkansas were unaware, prior to the mergers, of their opportunities concerning various retirement plans or systems and that the merger legislation continued them in the retirement plans of which they were then members, and such persons should be given an opportunity to elect a retirement plan prior to the next employment period, so that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to establish procedures therefor. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 545, § 3: Mar. 19, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that statutes governing membership in the Teacher Retirement System and the Public Employees Retirement Systems appear to be in conflict. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 1244, § 43: Apr. 17, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly that the restructuring of the delivery system of adult education and vocational education in this state is necessary to provide higher quality educational programs which are accessible by all segments of the population in this state; that recent studies have shown that in the year 2000, workers must have a minimum of fourteen (14) years education to function in the work force; that the state is in desperate need of training, retraining and upgrading the work force; that this act will provide a means to establish more institutions working closely with business and industry to provide every citizen with an opportunity to participate in vocational-technical training or college transfer programs within a reasonable driving distance of their homes; that it is necessary for this act to become effective immediately so needed changes can be made prior to the date the institutions contained herein are transferred to the new system. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 28: July 1, 1998.

Acts 2013, No. 337, § 6: July 1, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that statutes concerning the Arkansas public retirement plans are in need of revision to maintain the public retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the state operates on a July 1 to June 30 fiscal year; and that this act is necessary to ensure provisions of this act are effective at the beginning of the fiscal year for ease of administration and operation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2013.”

24-7-1001. Membership in Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for certain employees of state colleges.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is directed to include within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as created by § 24-4-103, all employees of Arkansas Tech University, Southern Arkansas University, University of Central Arkansas, and Henderson State University who are not otherwise covered by some other existing public employee retirement plan other than Social Security.

The effective date of membership of the employees in the system shall be January 1, 1963.

All the employees enrolled in the system shall be subject to the rights, privileges, and limitations of §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-105, 24-4-201, 24-4-202, 24-4-203 [repealed], 24-4-204 [repealed], 24-4-205, 24-4-207 — 24-4-209, 24-4-301 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401, 24-4-402, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-512, 24-4-513 [repealed], 24-4-601 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605, and 24-4-606.

Becoming members of the system shall be a condition of continuing in or obtaining employment, as the case may be.

Any employee included within the membership of the system shall be given credit for service rendered prior to July 1, 1957, as an employee of a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, or of any state college named in subsection (a) of this section, if so employed by one of the institutions of higher learning on July 1, 1957.

Any employee receiving retirement coverage under the provisions of this section who was an employee of one (1) of the institutions of higher learning on January 1, 1963, may apply for and receive current service credit for service rendered as an employee of that institution from July 1, 1957, to July 1, 1963, but only if the employee pays to the system all necessary contributions, at the rate of four percent (4%) for the employee and four percent (4%) for the employer, that would have been paid had the employee been a member of the system during that time.

The contributions shall have been paid in full on or before July 1, 1966.

Excluded from the provisions of this section are employees classified as student labor, graduate assistants, and seasonal agricultural workers.

History.

Acts 1963, No. 149, §§ 1-3, 5; 1965, No. 397, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2525 — 12-2527, 12-2529; Acts 2013, No. 337, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), deleted “the University of Arkansas at Monticello, Arkansas State University — Jonesboro,” “Arkansas State University — Beebe,” and “the University of Arkansas — Pine Bluff” and substituted “public employee retirement plan” for “state supported retirement system.”

24-7-1002. Membership in Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for certain employees of colleges, universities, and community colleges.

All persons, except those who are eligible for membership in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as provided for under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, § 24-7-201 et seq., and except those who are eligible for membership in an alternate system as provided for under §§ 24-7-801 and 24-7-803 — 24-7-808, employed by the University of Central Arkansas, Henderson State University, Arkansas Tech University, Southern Arkansas University, Southern Arkansas University at El Dorado, SAU — Tech at Camden, or a state-supported community college that is other than a campus, unit, or division of the University of Arkansas System or the Arkansas State University System after March 19, 1983, shall be members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System unless, at the time of employment, they are already members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System due to previous employment with an employer covered by the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

All persons except those who are members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, as provided for in subsection (a) of this section, and except those who are eligible for membership in an alternate system as provided for under the provisions of §§ 24-7-801 and 24-7-803 — 24-7-808, who are employees of the institutions named in subsection (a) of this section shall have the option of remaining members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or terminating membership in that system and enrolling in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The election to change systems must be made on or before July 30, 1986.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 545, §§ 1, 2; 1985, No. 511, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2581, 12-2581.1; Acts 1993, No. 447, § 10; 2013, No. 337, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (a), deleted “Arkansas State University, Arkansas State University — Beebe,” following “employed by,” and inserted “that is other than a campus, unit, or division of the University of Arkansas System or the Arkansas State University System”; and made stylistic changes..

24-7-1003 — 24-7-1007. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning membership in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for certain University of Arkansas employees, continuation of participation in the respective systems by employees of former Arkansas Agricultural and Mechanical College and University of Arkansas at Monticello, option of employees of former Arkansas Agricultural and Mechanical College and former Arkansas Agricultural, Mechanical, and Normal College to participate in University of Arkansas retirement plan, retirement system for employees of University of Arkansas agricultural experiment stations, and Pine Bluff — employee retirement systems, were repealed by Acts 2013, No. 337, § 3. The sections were derived from the following sources:

24-7-1003. Acts 1983, No. 670, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2582, 12-2582.1.

24-7-1004. Acts 1971, No. 9, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-2889.

24-7-1005. Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1075, § 3; 1981, No. 288, § 1; 1981, No. 925, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-2889.2, 80-3222; Acts 1997, No. 1053, § 11.

24-7-1006. Acts 1945, No. 83, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-3007, 80-3008.

24-7-1007. Acts 1971, No. 512, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3201n.

24-7-1008. Continued membership in retirement plan — Election.

Each instructor and administrative staff member of a state-supported postsecondary vocational-technical school employed on July 1, 1991, shall, within ninety (90) days following the transfer to the technical and community college system established under the Two-Year Postsecondary Education Reorganization Act of 1991, § 6-53-101 et seq., or upon transfer to the system with the approval of the board, elect either to continue membership in the retirement plan in which he or she was enrolled prior to that date or transfer to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System or any alternate retirement plan currently established for the institution into which it is being merged or consolidated.

Once such an election is made, the election is irrevocable during the tenure of employment with the system.

Each instructor and administrative staff member of a two-year campus of a four-year institution which is later converted to a technical college or community college under § 6-53-101 et seq. shall, within ninety (90) days following the appointment of the local board, elect either to continue membership in the retirement plan in which he or she was enrolled prior to the conversion or to transfer membership to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

Once such an election is made, the election is irrevocable during the tenure of employment with the system.

Any other employees of an institution transferring to the system under this section or under the approval of the board shall remain members of the retirement system to which they were enrolled prior to the transfer.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1244, § 34.

24-7-1009. Retirement plan options for employees of campuses, units, and divisions of the University of Arkansas System.

An employee of a campus, unit, or division of the University of Arkansas System, whose appointment is half-time or greater and the employment is not seasonal, extra help, temporary, or incidental to his or her education, may participate in a retirement plan sponsored by the University of Arkansas System or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as permitted by the policy adopted by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas.

Once an employee makes an election as provided in subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the election is irrevocable during the employee's tenure of employment with the University of Arkansas System.

If an employee who is not eligible to participate under subsection (a) of this section becomes eligible under policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas to participate in a retirement plan sponsored by the University of Arkansas System or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, the employee shall participate in a retirement plan sponsored by the University of Arkansas System or the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as permitted by policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas beginning on the date the employee becomes eligible.

If an employee under subdivision (b)(1) of this section elects to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as permitted by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas policy, the employee shall receive credit for service for the period of time in which the employee was ineligible to participate if the employee buys service credit by paying in one (1) lump sum:

All the employee contributions at the rate and based on the compensation that would have been paid to the employee during the ineligible period of time;

All the employer contributions based on the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System employer normal cost from the most recently completed Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid to the employee during the ineligible period of time; and

The regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date of service that was rendered to the date the payment is received by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The University of Arkansas System shall comply with the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System rules for an employee of a campus, unit, or division of the University of Arkansas System who is eligible under policies adopted by the Board of Trustees of the University of Arkansas and elects to participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no employee of a campus, unit, or division of the University of Arkansas System may be permitted to enroll in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who would not be eligible to enroll under Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System rules.

Beginning July 1, 2011, a new employee of the University of Arkansas System shall not participate in the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 337, § 4.

Subchapter 11
— Nonteaching Employees of Public Schools

Effective Dates.

Acts 1971, No. 438, § 3: Mar. 29, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a number of the members of the State Employees Retirement System have not obtained credited service in the retirement system for current service rendered either as a nonteaching employee of the public schools or as an employee of an institution of higher learning and that only by the immediate passage of this Act can these employees obtain necessary credit and pay such necessary contributions therefor. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

24-7-1101. Membership in Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is directed to include within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as created by § 24-4-103, all nonteaching employees of the public schools of this state who are not members of, or eligible for membership in, some other existing state-supported retirement system other than Social Security.

The board shall establish a Division of Nonteaching Public School Employees in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund which shall be maintained and operated in the same manner as the State Division, the County Division, and the Municipal Division of the fund.

The several school districts of the state, as participating public employers, shall pay into the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund such sums of money as are necessary to match the contributions of its nonteaching employees in the same form and manner and subject to all the provisions of §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-105, 24-4-201, 24-4-202, 24-4-205, 24-4-207 — 24-4-209, 24-4-301 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401, 24-4-402, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-512, 24-4-513[repealed], 24-4-601 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605, and 24-4-606 to the same extent as other participating employers.

The effective date of membership of the employees in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be October 1, 1965.

All employees enrolled in the system shall be subject to the rights, privileges, and limitations prescribed in §§ 24-4-101 — 24-4-105, 24-4-201, 24-4-202, 24-4-205, 24-4-207 — 24-4-209, 24-4-301 — 24-4-304, 24-4-401, 24-4-402, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510 — 24-4-512, 24-4-513[repealed], 24-4-601 — 24-4-603, 24-4-605, and 24-4-606.

Every employee shall become a member of the system as a condition of continuing or obtaining employment.

Any employee included within the membership of the retirement system pursuant to this section shall be given credit for service rendered prior to October 1, 1957, as an employee of a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, or as a nonteaching employee of any public school of this state, if the employee was so employed on October 1, 1957, and on October 1, 1965.

Any employee included within the membership of the retirement system who was a nonteaching employee of the public schools in this state on October 1, 1965, or who was an employee of one (1) of the institutions of higher learning and who became a member on July 1, 1963, may apply for and receive current service credit in multiples of one (1) year for service rendered from October 1, 1957, to October 1, 1965, in the case of a nonteaching employee of the public schools of this state, or, in the case of an employee of one (1) of the institutions of higher learning, for service rendered as an employee of the institution from July 1, 1957, to July 1, 1963.

The employee may receive service credit only if the employee pays to the retirement system fund all necessary contributions, at the rate of four percent (4%) for the employee and four percent (4%) for the employer, that would have been paid had the employee been a member of the retirement system during that time, together with interest at three percent (3%) per annum compounded annually, from October 1, 1965, to the date of payment in the case of a nonteaching employee of the public schools, or, in the case of an employee of one of the institutions of higher learning, from July 1, 1957, to the date of payment.

The contributions shall have been paid in full on or before January 1, 1972.

In no case shall less than ten (10) days of service in any calendar month rendered by any member mentioned in this section be credited as a month of service, nor shall less than nine (9) months of service rendered in any one (1) fiscal school year be credited as a year of service.

History.

Acts 1965, No. 63, §§ 1-5; 1967, No. 63, § 1; 1971, No. 438, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2542 — 12-2546.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

These divisions of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as separate divisions of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Subchapter 12
— Tax-Deferred Savings Programs for the Members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System

Effective Dates.

Acts 2009, No. 468, § 28:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in dire need of technical correction to bring them into conformance with the current public pension policy; that such technical correction is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

24-7-1201 — 24-7-1206. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 468, § 26. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-7-1201. Acts 1993, No. 369, § 1.

24-7-1202. Acts 1993, No. 369, § 2.

24-7-1203. Acts 1993, No. 369, § 3.

24-7-1204. Acts 1993, No. 369, § 5.

24-7-1205. Acts 1993, No. 369, § 4.

24-7-1206. Acts 1993, No. 369, § 6.